Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1099	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1099	ényer	és/2	.	
SFX 1099	ényer	esa/2	.	
SFX 1099	ényer	esos/2	.	
SFX 1099	ényer	eses/2	.	
SFX 1099	ényer	ényer/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1100	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1100	òure	uit/2	.	
SFX 1100	òure	uita/2	.	
SFX 1100	òure	uits/2	.	
SFX 1100	òure	uites/2	.	
SFX 1100	òure	òure/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1101	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1101	òure	ogut/2	.	
SFX 1101	òure	oguda/2	.	
SFX 1101	òure	oguts/2	.	
SFX 1101	òure	ogudes/2	.	
SFX 1101	òure	òure/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1102	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1102	actar	orsioat/2	.	
SFX 1102	actar	orsioada/2	.	
SFX 1102	actar	orsioats/2	.	
SFX 1102	actar	orsioades/2	.	
SFX 1102	actar	actar/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1103	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1103	ar	meat/2	.	
SFX 1103	ar	meada/2	.	
SFX 1103	ar	meats/2	.	
SFX 1103	ar	meades/2	.	
SFX 1103	ar	ar/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1104	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1104	ar	at/2	.	
SFX 1104	ar	da/2	.	
SFX 1104	ar	ats/2	.	
SFX 1104	ar	ades/2	.	
SFX 1104	ar	ar/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1105	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1105	atraure	traet/2	.	
SFX 1105	atraure	atreta/2	.	
SFX 1105	atraure	atrets/2	.	
SFX 1105	atraure	atretes/2	.	
SFX 1105	atraure	atraure/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1106	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1106	car	cat/2	.	
SFX 1106	car	da/2	.	
SFX 1106	car	cats/2	.	
SFX 1106	car	cades/2	.	
SFX 1106	car	car/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1107	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1107	der	gut/2	.	
SFX 1107	der	guda/2	.	
SFX 1107	der	guts/2	.	
SFX 1107	der	gudes/2	.	
SFX 1107	der	der/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1108	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1108	dre	ut/2	.	
SFX 1108	dre	uts/2	.	
SFX 1108	dre	uda/2	.	
SFX 1108	dre	udes/2	.	
SFX 1108	dre	dre/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1109	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1109	dre	t/2	.	
SFX 1109	dre	ta/2	.	
SFX 1109	dre	ts/2	.	
SFX 1109	dre	tes/2	.	
SFX 1109	dre	dre's/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1110	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1110	dre	rdut/2	.	
SFX 1110	dre	rduda/2	.	
SFX 1110	dre	rduts/2	.	
SFX 1110	dre	rdudes/2	.	
SFX 1110	dre	dre/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1111	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1111	er	igut/2	.	
SFX 1111	er	iguda/2	.	
SFX 1111	er	iguts/2	.	
SFX 1111	er	igudes/2	.	
SFX 1111	er	er/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1112	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1112	imir	és/2	.	
SFX 1112	imir	esa/2	.	
SFX 1112	imir	esos/2	.	
SFX 1112	imir	eses/2	.	
SFX 1112	imir	imir/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1113	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1113	ixir	ixit/2	.	
SFX 1113	ixir	ixida/2	.	
SFX 1113	ixir	ixits/2	.	
SFX 1113	ixir	xides/2	.	
SFX 1113	ixir	ixir/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1114	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1114	lluir	ït/2	.	
SFX 1114	lluir	ïda/2	.	
SFX 1114	lluir	ïts/2	.	
SFX 1114	lluir	ïdes/2	.	
SFX 1114	lluir	lluir/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1115	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1115	ndre	st/2	.	
SFX 1115	ndre	sta/2	.	
SFX 1115	ndre	sts/2	.	
SFX 1115	ndre	stes/2	.	
SFX 1115	ndre	ndre's/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1116	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1116	oldre	òlt/2	.	
SFX 1116	oldre	òlta/2	.	
SFX 1116	oldre	òlts/2	.	
SFX 1116	oldre	òltes/2	.	
SFX 1116	oldre	oldre/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1117	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1117	oure	uit/2	.	
SFX 1117	oure	uita/2	.	
SFX 1117	oure	uits/2	.	
SFX 1117	oure	uites/2	.	
SFX 1117	oure	oure/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1118	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1118	r	gut/2	.	
SFX 1118	r	guda/2	.	
SFX 1118	r	guts/2	.	
SFX 1118	r	gudes/2	.	
SFX 1118	r	r/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1119	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1119	r	at/2	.	
SFX 1119	r	da/2	.	
SFX 1119	r	ts/2	.	
SFX 1119	r	des/2	.	
SFX 1119	r	r/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1120	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1120	rdre	rdut/2	.	
SFX 1120	rdre	rduda/2	.	
SFX 1120	rdre	duts/2	.	
SFX 1120	rdre	rdudes/2	.	
SFX 1120	rdre	rdre/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1121	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1121	unyir	onyit/2	.	
SFX 1121	unyir	onyida/2	.	
SFX 1121	unyir	onyits/2	.	
SFX 1121	unyir	onyides/2	.	
SFX 1121	unyir	unyir/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1122	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1122	ure	xcut/2	.	
SFX 1122	ure	xcuda/2	.	
SFX 1122	ure	xcuts/2	.	
SFX 1122	ure	xcudes/2	.	
SFX 1122	ure	ure's/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1123	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1123	ure	ït/2	.	
SFX 1123	ure	ïda/2	.	
SFX 1123	ure	ïts/2	.	
SFX 1123	ure	ïdes/2	.	
SFX 1123	ure	ure/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1124	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1124	ver	gut/2	.	
SFX 1124	ver	guda/2	.	
SFX 1124	ver	guts/2	.	
SFX 1124	ver	gudes/2	.	
SFX 1124	ver	ver/2,453,452	.	
