Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.dic
acontényer/451,576,577,578,579,580,581,582,583,1099
desempelluncar/455,456,457,458,473,474,475,476,828,1106
flixar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1119
incautar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1104
moldre/481,482,483,484,485,490,492,498,1056,1116
morfinisar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,866,878,1054,1103
recerndre/481,482,483,484,485,490,492,498,1108
recoure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,995,1117
ser/455,456,828,923,925,1006,1007,1008,1009,1010,1111,1118
sobreimprimir/455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1112
